Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2611
Notice to educational institution.

(1) Within seventy-two
hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next scheduled
athletic event in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs
first, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of
the contract to the athletic director of the educational institution at which
the student-athlete is enrolled or the athlete agent has reasonable grounds
to believe the student-athlete intends to enroll.

(2) Within seventy-two
hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next athletic event
in which the student-athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the
student-athlete shall inform the athletic director of the educational institution
at which the student-athlete is enrolled that he or she has entered into an
agency contract.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 11.